District of Columbia statutes.
44-706

Institutional care under contract.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to contract with hospitals and other institutions for both the care of indigent or medically indigent patients in hospitals and the care and maintenance of persons for whom the District of Columbia is responsible. The Mayor may from time to time adjust the rates of reimbursement for such care by issuing rules pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, and by filing a copy of proposed rate changes with the Council of the District of Columbia at least 30 days before their effective date. The 30-day period for Council review shall not include days that pass during a recess of the Council. The rates of reimbursement under the D.C. Medical Charities program in effect for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1985, shall thereafter remain in effect until adjusted by the Mayor in accordance with this section.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 505, Pub. L. 93-140, § 5
July 25, 1985, D.C. Law 6-11, § 2, 32 DCR 3230
1981 Ed., § 32-125.
1973 Ed., § 32-332.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-11, see Mayor’s Order 86-37, March 3, 1986.
Delegation of authority pursuant to An Act to authorize certain programs and activities of the government of the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, see Mayor’s Order 99-73, May 4, 1999 ( 46 DCR 4391).